Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 3. Environmental Pesticide Control

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 47.

Tort liability of governmental unit for injury or damage resulting from insecticide and vermin eradication operations, 25 ALR2d 1057.

Liability for injury caused by spraying or dusting of crops, 37 ALR3d 833.

Exterminator's tort liability for personal injury or death directly resulting from operations, 29 ALR4th 987.

Liability of termite or other pest control or inspection contractor for work or representations, 32 ALR4th 682.

Infliction of emotional distress: toxic exposure, 6 ALR5th 162.

Governmental recovery of cost of hazardous waste removal under Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USC § 9601 et seq.), 70 ALR Fed 329.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving herbicide, pesticide and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 249.

Federal pre-emption of state common-law products liability claims pertaining to pesticides, 101 ALR Fed 887.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 95 to 104.

§ 35-7-350.
Short title.

This act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1973”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.1.

§ 35-7-351.
Enforcing agency.

This act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] shall be administered by the department of agriculture of the state of Wyoming, hereinafter referred to as the “department”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.2.

§ 35-7-352.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature hereby finds that pesticides and devices are valuable to our state’s agricultural production and to the protection of man and the environment from insects, rodents, weeds, and other forms of life which may be pests, and it is essential to the public health and welfare that they be regulated closely to prevent adverse effects on human life and the environment. The purpose of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] is to regulate, in the public interest, the labeling, distribution, storage, transportation, disposal, use and application of pesticides to control pests. New pesticides are continually being discovered or synthesized which are valuable for the control of pests, and for use as defoliants, desiccants, plant regulators, and related purposes. The dissemination of accurate scientific information as to the proper use or nonuse, of any pesticide, is vital to the public health and welfare and the environment both immediate and future. Therefore, it is deemed necessary to provide for registration of pesticides and devices.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.3.

§ 35-7-353.
Board of certification.

A board of certification is established consisting of the director of the department of agriculture, and a member of the Wyoming weed and pest council and a University of Wyoming weed or pest specialist to be appointed by the governor. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.4; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-354.
Definitions.

“Applicator” or “operator” means:

“Certified applicator” means any individual who is certified by the director as being competent with respect to the use and handling of pesticides, or of the use and handling of the pesticide or class of pesticides covered by the individual’s certification;

“Commercial applicator” means a certified applicator (whether or not he is a private applicator with respect to some uses) who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide which is classified for restricted use for any purpose or on any property other than as provided by paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection;

“Private applicator” means any certified applicator who uses or supervises the use of any restricted use pesticide which is restricted to use by certified applicators and only for purposes of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned by him or his employer or under his control or (is applied without compensation other than trading of personal services between producers of agricultural commodities) on the property of another person.

“Board of agriculture” means that body established by law under W.S.

11-2-102

.

“Device” means any instrument or contrivance (other than a firearm) which is intended for trapping, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any other form of plant or animal life (other than man, or bacteria, virus, or other microorganism on or in living man or other living animals) but does not include equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately therefrom.

“Pesticide” means:

Any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pests;

Any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant;

Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a spray adjuvant; and

Any other pesticide product or substance whether general use, restricted use, registered, suspended or cancelled, which by the label or portions thereof clearly show it is used or has been used as a pesticide.

“Restricted use pesticide” means any pesticide product, the label of which states “restricted use” as required for registration by the environmental protection agency under the federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act of 1972 [7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.], as amended.

“Dealer” or “distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, distributes, offers to sell or sells, barters or otherwise supplies pesticides in this state. A dealer or distributor may also be a registrant.

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture or his authorized agent.

“Label” means a display of written, printed or graphic matter upon or affixed to the immediate container of any pesticide, or a reference within such display to other information.

“Official sample” means any sample of a pesticide, degradate or residue taken by and designated as official by the director.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.5; Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 2; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2013 ch. 153, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d)(iv) through (j), making a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act. —

The Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, referred to in subsection (e), appears as 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.

§ 35-7-355.
Director to administer and enforce provisions; board of certification to adopt regulations.

The director of the department of agriculture shall administer and enforce the provisions of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] and regulations issued thereunder. The board of certification may issue regulations after a public hearing following due notice to all interested persons in conformance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to carry out the provisions of this act. Regulations may prescribe methods to be used in the application of pesticides, may prescribe standards for the classification and certification of applicators of pesticides, and may require certification, licensing, payment of reasonable fees for licensing or certification, submission of information, and passing of examinations by applicators of pesticides. Where the board of certification finds that regulations are necessary to carry out the purpose and intent of this act, the regulations may relate to the time, place, manner, methods, materials, and amounts and concentrations, in connection with the application of the pesticide, and may restrict or prohibit use of pesticides in designated areas during specified periods of time and shall encompass all reasonable factors which the board deems necessary. The department may issue licenses. Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S. 35-7-354(e), the board of agriculture, by regulation, following a hearing and pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, may declare a specific pesticide or pesticide use a “restricted use pesticide”, but only following a recommendation of the board of certification, and a finding of fact, in a public hearing conducted by the board of certification, that unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, including man, pollinating insects, animals, crops, wildlife and lands, other than pests, may reasonably occur. The director of the department of agriculture may allow the registration, licensing, testing, inspection and reporting requirements of this article to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.6; Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 2; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2005, ch. 175, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

added the last sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 175, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-7-356.
Registration.

Every pesticide or device which is distributed within this state or delivered for transportation or transported in intrastate commerce or between points within this state through any point outside this state shall be registered with the department of agriculture by its manufacturer or formulator subject to the provisions of this act. The registration shall be renewed annually prior to December 31 of each year but not if a pesticide or device is shipped from one plant or warehouse to another plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make a pesticide or device which is registered under the provisions of this act, if the pesticide or device is not sold and if the container thereof is plainly and conspicuously marked “For Experimental Use Only”, together with the manufacturer’s name and address, or if a written permit has been obtained from the department to sell the specific pesticide or device for experimental purposes subject to restrictions and conditions set forth in the permit.

The applicant for registration shall file a statement with the department which shall include:

The name and address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will appear on the label, if other than the applicant’s;

The name of the pesticide or device;

Other necessary information required for completion of the department’s application for registration form;

The use classification as provided in the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act when required by regulations under this act.

The director may require a full description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which the claims are based on any pesticide or device on which restrictions are being considered. In the case of renewal of registration, a statement shall be required only with respect to information which is different from that furnished when the pesticide or device was registered or last registered. The director may prescribe other necessary information by regulation.

Every registrant of a pesticide or device shall pay an annual registration fee of one hundred forty dollars ($140.00) for each product registered. All registrations shall expire on December 31 of each year, following the date of the registration, and may thereupon be renewed for successive periods of twelve (12) months upon payment of the proper fee. One hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) of the fee collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the special natural resource account in the department of agriculture which is hereby created. Funds in the special natural resource account are continuously appropriated to the department and shall only be used to provide funding for the pesticide registration fee program. Fifteen dollars ($15.00) of the fee collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the pesticide education account in the department of agriculture which is hereby created. Funds in the pesticide education account are continuously appropriated to the department and shall only be used to provide funding for the pesticide applicator certification program provided by the University of Wyoming.

Any registration approved by the director and in effect on December 31 for which a renewal application has been made and the proper fee paid, shall continue in full force and effect until such time as the director notifies the applicant that the registration has been renewed, or otherwise denied in accord with the provisions of W.S.

35-7-358

. Forms for registration shall be mailed to registrants at least thirty (30) days prior to the due date.

If it appears to the director that the composition of the pesticide or device is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it and if the pesticide and its labeling and other material required to be submitted comply with the requirements of this act he shall register the pesticide.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.7; Laws 1993, ch. 147, § 1; ch. 191, § 3; 2006, ch. 20, § 1; 2016 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

in the third sentence of (d), substituted “special natural resource account in the department of agriculture which is hereby created” for “general fund and may be appropriated by the legislature,” deleted “11-16-105(a)(v) and

35-7-350

through

35-7-374

” at the end, and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 20, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2006.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (d), substituted “ninety dollars ($90.00)” for “seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in the first sentence and “Seventy-five dollars ($75.00) of the fee collected pursuant to this subsection” for “Funds collected pursuant to this section” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d), substituted “a pesticide” for “pesticides,” “one hundred forty dollars ($140.00)” for “ninety dollars ($90.00) each,” and “each” for “every” in the first sentence, substituted “One hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00)” for “Seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” at the beginning of the third sentence and deleted “for programs authorized by W.S.

11-5-113

and

11-5-303

” from the end, and added the fourth sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 20, §§ 2, 3, provide:

“Section 2. There is authorized a special natural resource account in the department of agriculture for the purpose of collecting and disbursing funds pursuant to W.S. 35-7-356(d).

“Section 3. For the period beginning July 1, 2006 and ending June 30, 2008, the department of agriculture is authorized to expend not to exceed one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000.00) from the special natural resource account for purposes specified in W.S.

35-7-356

. Any further requests for expenditures from this account shall be included in the department's budget request and shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature.”

§ 35-7-357.
Experimental use permits.

Any person may apply to the director of the department of agriculture for an experimental use permit for a pesticide. The director may issue an experimental use permit if he determines that the applicant needs the permit in order to accumulate information necessary to register a pesticide under this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

]. An application for an experimental use permit may be filed at the time of or before or after an application for registration is filed.

Use of a pesticide under an experimental use permit shall be under the supervision of the director, and shall be subject to such terms and conditions and be for such period of time as the director may prescribe in the permit.

The director may revoke any experimental use permit, at any time, if he finds that its terms or conditions are being violated, or that its terms and conditions are inadequate to avoid unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.8; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-358.
Refusal to register; cancellation; suspension; legal recourse.

If it does not appear to the director of the department of agriculture that the pesticide or device is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it or if the pesticide or device and its labeling and other material required to be submitted do not comply with the provisions of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] or regulations adopted thereunder, he shall notify the applicant of the manner in which the pesticide or device, labeling, or other material required to be submitted fails to comply with the provisions of this act so as to afford the applicant an opportunity to make the necessary corrections. If, upon receipt of notice, the applicant does not make the required changes the director may refuse to register the pesticide or device. The applicant may request a hearing as provided for in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The director, when he determines that the pesticide or device or labeling does not comply with the provisions of the act or the regulations adopted thereunder, may cancel the registration of a pesticide or device after a hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The director, when he determines that there is an imminent hazard, may suspend on his own motion, the registration of a pesticide in conformance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Any person who will be adversely affected by an order under this section may obtain judicial review in accord with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.9; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-7-359.
Classification of licenses.

Licenses shall include but are not limited to:

Commercial applicator license;

Private applicator license.

A commercial applicator shall notify the department of any change of address or change of employment within thirty (30) days of that change.

The director may refuse an application for a reciprocal license for just cause including, but not limited to:

An incomplete or falsified application;

A prior violation related to pesticides in this state or another state.

The director may immediately suspend a reciprocal license upon discovery of any violation under subsection (c) of this section. The director may reinstate a license suspended under this subsection following a hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.10; 2013 ch. 153, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b) through (d).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See
§ 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-7-360.
Liability for damage; service of process.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 3.

Nothing in this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] shall be construed to relieve any person from liability for any damage to the person or lands of another caused by the use of pesticides even though such use conforms to the rules and regulations of this act.

Before the director shall issue a pesticide applicator’s license to a nonresident to apply pesticides in this state, each nonresident pesticide applicator shall appoint the director as his attorney to receive services of legal process issued against the pesticide applicator in this state. The appointment, effect of appointment, and procedures for service of process shall be as provided by W.S.

26-3-121

and

26-3-122

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.11; Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 3; 1993 ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-361.
Inspection of equipment.

The director may provide for inspection of any equipment used for application of pesticides and may require repairs or other changes before its further use for pesticide application. A list of requirements that equipment shall meet may be adopted by regulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.12; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-362.
Reciprocal agreement.

The director may issue a license or certification on a reciprocal basis with other states without examination to a nonresident who is licensed, or certified, in another state substantially in accordance with the provisions of this act but financial security as provided for in W.S.

35-7-360

or proof of liability insurance shall be submitted by nonresident commercial applicators. The department shall, by rule and regulation, establish criteria for reciprocity including, but not limited to, formal agreements with other states, residency, categories and examination. The director is authorized to adopt additional rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.13; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2013 ch. 153, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Section

35-7-360

, by the 1979 amendment thereof, no longer relates to financial security.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or proof of liability insurance” near the end of the first sentence and added the second and third sentences.

§ 35-7-363.
Exemptions.

The provision of W.S.

35-7-355

relating to licenses and requirements for their issuance shall not apply to any private applicator applying pesticides for himself or with ground equipment or manually for his neighbors, except as to specific regulations as to the use of restricted pesticides and certification qualifications for private applicators, if:

He operates farm property or operates and maintains pesticide application equipment primarily for his own use;

He is not engaged in the business of applying pesticides for hire amounting to a principal or regular occupation and he does not publicly hold himself out as a pesticide applicator.

The word “device” shall not be construed to mean fly swatter, butterfly net, or any mechanical contrivance used to trap or kill insects or rodents.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.14.

§ 35-7-364.
Discarding and storing of pesticides and pesticide containers.

No person shall discard, transport, or store any pesticide or pesticide containers in such a manner as to cause injury to humans, vegetation, crops, livestock, wildlife, beneficial insects or to pollute any waterway in a way harmful to any wildlife therein. The board of certification may promulgate rules and regulations governing the discarding and storing of such pesticides or pesticide containers.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.15.

§ 35-7-365.
Subpoenas.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or production of books, documents, and records in the state in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license, registration, or permit issued under the provisions of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

].

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.16; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-366.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of W.S.

35-7-350

through

35-7-375

or regulation thereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, for the first offense, and upon conviction for a subsequent offense shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both. Any offense committed more than three (3) years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision or any regulation made pursuant to W.S.

35-7-350

through

35-7-375

in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the violation occurs or is about to occur. The action may be initiated by the attorney general or the district attorney for the county in which the violation has or is about to occur.

No state court shall allow the recovery of damages from administrative action taken if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

If the department incurs fees or other expenses to remediate a violation by an applicator, the department may seek restitution from the applicator or the applicator’s employer through a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.17; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 50, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2001, ch. 56, § 2; 2013 ch. 153, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d).

§ 35-7-367.
Enforcement.

The sampling and examination of pesticides or devices shall be made under the direction of the director for the purpose of determining whether they comply with the requirements of this act. The director is authorized, upon presentation of proper identification, to enter any distributor’s premises, including any vehicle of transport, at all reasonable times in order to have access to pesticides or devices. If it appears from such examination that a pesticide or device fails to comply with the provisions of this act or regulations adopted thereunder, and the director contemplates instituting criminal proceedings against any person, the director shall cause appropriate notice to be given to such person. Any person so notified shall be given an opportunity within a reasonable time to present his views, either orally or in writing, with regard to the contemplated proceedings. If thereafter in the opinion of the director, it appears that the provisions of the act or regulations adopted thereunder have been violated by such person, the director shall refer a copy of the results of the analysis or the examination of such pesticide or device to the district attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring the director to report minor violations of this act for prosecution or for the institution of condemnation proceedings when he believes that the public interest will be served best by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this act the director may enter upon any public or private premises at reasonable times, in order:

To have access for the purpose of inspecting any equipment subject to this act and such premises on which the equipment is kept or stored;

To inspect lands actually or reported to be exposed to pesticides;

To inspect storage or disposal areas;

To inspect or investigate complaints of injury to humans or land;

To sample pesticides being applied or to be applied.

If the director is denied access to any land where access was sought for the purposes set forth in this act, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to such lands for the stated purposes. The court shall with probable cause upon such application issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this act or any rule made pursuant to this act in the district court of the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.18; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The reference to “this act” in subsection (a) of this section apparently means Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1 which affected titles 1, 5, 6, 7, 9, 11, 12, 14, 18, 19, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 31, 33, 35, 37, 39, 40 and 41. See the Table of Disposition of Acts in volume 11.

§ 35-7-368.
Cooperation.

The director is authorized to cooperate with and enter into agreements with any other agency of this state, the United States, and any other state or agency thereof for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] and securing uniformity of regulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.19; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-369.
Disposition of funds.

All moneys received by the department under the provisions of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] shall be deposited into the treasury of the state to the credit of the general fund, excluding those funds collected pursuant to W.S. 35-7-356(d).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.20; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2006, ch. 20, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “excluding those funds collected pursuant to W.S. 35-7-356(d).”

Laws 2006, ch. 20, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2006.

§ 35-7-370.
Severability.

If any provision of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this act and applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.21.

§ 35-7-371.
Prior liability.

The enactment of this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on the date this act becomes effective.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.22.

§ 35-7-372.
Jurisdiction; repeals.

Jurisdiction in all matters pertaining to the registration, distribution, transportation and disposal of pesticides and devices is by this act [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

] vested exclusively in the director and board of certification and all acts and parts of acts inconsistent with this act are hereby expressly repealed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-262.23; Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 35-7-373.
Registration of aircraft.

Any person engaged in the activity or business of applying pesticides utilizing any type of aircraft shall register each aircraft annually with the Wyoming department of agriculture, on a printed form provided by the department. The registration shall include the following:

Manufacturer, model and type of aircraft;

Identification number assigned to the aircraft;

Owner of the aircraft; and

User of the aircraft if different from the owner.

The fee authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

shall be charged to each person registering aircraft. Aircraft shall be registered on or before April 1 of each year.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 1; 1993, ch. 135, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Anticompetitive covenants: aerial spray dust business, 60 ALR4th 965.

§ 35-7-374.
Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Detach, alter, deface or destroy, in whole or in part, any labeling prior to proper disposal of the pesticide containers;

Refuse to keep any records as required by the director by regulation or to refuse to allow the inspection of such records by the director during normal working hours;

Make available for use, or to use, any restricted pesticide classified for restricted use for some or all purposes, except by or under the direct supervision of a certified applicator;

Use any pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling which means to use any pesticide in a manner not permitted by the labeling, or not authorized by the director under a special local need registration, an experimental use permit or an emergency exemption, provided that this paragraph does not include:

Applying a pesticide at any dosage, concentration or frequency less than that specified on the labeling;

Applying a pesticide against any target pest not specified on the labeling if the application is to the crop, animal or site specified on the labeling;

Employing any method of application not prohibited by the labeling; or

Mixing a pesticide or pesticides with a fertilizer when the mixture is not prohibited by the labeling.

To falsify any records required by the director by regulation;

To falsify any application, examination or affidavit for certification or license;

Other than certified applicators or persons working under their direct supervision to use restricted use pesticides;

To use restricted use pesticides inconsistent with the applicator category of certification.

If the director finds that the violation occurred despite the exercise of due care or did not cause significant harm to another person, to health or to the environment, he shall issue a warning in lieu of prosecution.

Except as otherwise provided by the Wyoming Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1973 [§§

35-7-350

through

35-7-372

], no political subdivision of this state shall adopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation regarding pesticides storage, sale, distribution, notification of use, or use that is more stringent than the Wyoming Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1973 or rules promulgated thereunder.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 91, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 2013 ch. 153, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “registered” before “pesticide” twice in (a)(iv) and added (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes use of pesticide in manner inconsistent with its labeling, so as to violate § 12(a)(2)(G) of Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 USC § 136j(a)(2)(G)), 69 ALR Fed 835.

§ 35-7-375.
Required notification of pesticide application on or within school buildings.

Any commercial applicator licensed under W.S.

35-7-359

or any other person shall provide notification required by this section of the application of any pesticide as defined under W.S. 35-7-354(d) which is applied on or within any building or other real property used by a school district primarily for the education of students, including any property used by the district for student activities or playgrounds. Notice under this subsection shall be provided to the district not less than seventy-two (72) hours prior to application and the district shall further notify students, teachers and staff. All notices distributed under this subsection shall be marked with a distribution date and include information indicating date of application, location of application or treatment area, pest to be controlled, name and type of pesticide to be applied and a contact for additional information. All notices distributed under this subsection shall be retained by the school or school district for two (2) years.

In addition to notice required under subsection (a) of this section, the licensed commercial applicator or other school employee applying pesticides shall post signs on the school building or property stating the date of application, the location of the application or treatment area, the name and type of the pesticide to be applied and a contact for additional information. Upon request, the licensed commercial applicator or other school employee shall provide information on how to obtain additional information on the pesticide. Not less than twelve (12) hours before application of pesticides within school buildings, signs shall be posted at main entrances to school buildings and at the entrances to the specific application area within buildings. If pesticide application is made outdoors to any area adjacent to a school building or on property used by the district for student activities or playgrounds, signs shall be posted immediately adjacent to the treated area and at the entrance to the district property. The signs shall remain posted for seventy-two (72) hours.

Anti-microbial pesticides defined under W.S. 35-7-354(d), such as disinfectants and sanitizers used by school employees for cleaning purposes and insect or rodent bait stations of the type available for home use are exempted from the notification and posting requirements specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 56, § 1.

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, Construction, and Operation of State and Municipal Act or Regulation Requiring Notice of Pesticide and Herbicide Use. 18 A.L.R.6th 793.

§ 35-7-376.
Direct supervision.

As used in this section, unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a pesticide shall be considered to be applied under the direct supervision of a certified applicator if it is applied by a competent person acting under the instructions and control of a certified applicator who is available within a reasonable time and distance, even though the certified applicator is not physically present at the time and place the pesticide is applied.

All pesticide applications made for hire shall be under the direct supervision of a certified commercial applicator. All applications of restricted use pesticide shall be made under the direct supervision of a certified applicator. Availability of the certified applicator shall be directly related to the potential hazard of the situation. The certified applicator shall be:

Available by immediate contact through telephone or radio; or

Physically present on-site when use of the pesticide poses a potentially serious hazard to people or the environment.

As used in this section:

Reasonable time by the supervising applicator to on-site is deemed to be not more than one (1) hour response time;

Reasonable distance by the supervising applicator to on-site is deemed to be not more than fifty (50) air miles.

History.

2013 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.